Utah statutes.
31A-2-113.   Supporting services.
(1)  The Department of Administrative Services shall provide suitable offices
for the Insurance Department:
(a)  in Salt Lake City; and
(b)  elsewhere, if approved by the governor as necessary for the efficient
operation of the department.
(2)  The commissioner shall, in accordance with the rules of the Department of
Administrative Services or other applicable laws, procure or obtain access to
all materials, supplies, and equipment necessary for the efficient operation
of the Insurance Department, including reasonable library facilities and
books.
